Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,117
Shareholders information; filing requirements.

Unless proxies, consents, or authorizations in respect of a stock of a domestic insurer subject to the provisions of section 44-3,115 are solicited by or on behalf of the management of such insurer from the holders of record of stock of such insurer in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Director of Insurance pursuant to sections 44-3,115 to 44-3,118 prior to any annual or other meeting, such insurer shall, in accordance with such rules and regulations, file with the director and transmit to all shareholders of record information substantially equivalent to the information which would be required to be transmitted if such a solicitation were made.

Laws 1965, c. 249, § 3, p. 707;

Laws 1969, c. 369, § 5, p. 1312;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 114.